Utah statutes.
8-4-1.   Entities subject to chapter -- Definitions.
(1)  An endowment care cemetery in this state, except those owned and operated
by churches, religious or established fraternal societies, or incorporated
cities, towns, or other political subdivisions of the state, shall comply with
the requirements of this chapter.
(2)  As used in this chapter "endowment care cemetery" means a cemetery or
mausoleum for crypt or vault interments, columbarium for permanent cinerary
interments, or any other place providing lots or other interment space for the
remains of human bodies that:
(a)  represents to the public that it will care for, maintain, and embellish
its property to preserve it from becoming unkempt and a place of reproach and
desolation in the community in which it is located; and
(b)  collects funds for the purpose stated in Subsection (2)(a).
